Georgia, session 2025_26, HB804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-13-30 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to purchase,
possession, manufacture, distribution, or sale of controlled substances or marijuana and
penalties, is amended by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(j.1) Except as provided under paragraph (1) of subsection (j) of this Code section, the
following proclamation shall govern the simple possession of marijuana:
'Acting pursuant to the grant of authority in Article II, Section 2, of the Constitution of
the United States, the Office of the President of the United States does hereby grant a full,
complete, and unconditional pardon to (1) all current United States citizens and lawful
H. B. 804
- 1 -

LC 48 1577
permanent residents who committed the offense of simple possession of marijuana in
violation of the Controlled Substances Act, as currently codified at 21 U.S.C. 844 and as
previously codified elsewhere in the United States Code, or in violation of D.C. Code
48–904.01(d)(1), on or before the date of this proclamation, regardless of whether they
have been charged with or prosecuted for this offense on or before the date of this
proclamation; and (2) all current United States citizens and lawful permanent residents
who have been convicted of the offense of simple possession of marijuana in violation
of the Controlled Substances Act, as currently codified at 21 U.S.C. 844 and as
previously codified elsewhere in the United States Code, or in violation of D.C. Code
48–904.01(d)(1); which pardon shall restore to them full political, civil, and other rights.
The proclamation is to pardon only the offense of simple possession of marijuana in
violation of Federal law or in violation of D.C. Code 48–904.01(d)(1), and not any other
offenses related to marijuana or other controlled substances. No language herein shall
be construed to pardon any person for any other offense, including possession of other
controlled substances, whether committed prior, subsequent, or contemporaneous to the
pardoned offense of simple possession of marijuana.
Pursuant to this proclamation, the Attorney General, acting through the Pardon Attorney,
shall administer and effectuate the issuance of certificates of pardon to eligible applicants
who have been charged or convicted for the offense of simple possession of marijuana
in violation of the Controlled Substances Act, as currently codified at 21 U.S.C. 844 and
as previously codified elsewhere in the United States Code, or in violation of D.C. Code
48–904.01(d)(1). The Attorney General, acting through the Pardon Attorney, is directed
to develop and announce application procedures for certificates of pardon and to begin
accepting applications in accordance with such procedures as soon as reasonably
practicable. The Attorney General, acting through the Pardon Attorney, shall review all
properly submitted applications and shall issue certificates of pardon to eligible
applicants in due course.'"
H. B. 804
- 2 -

LC 48 1577
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 804
- 3 -